Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-120
State agency; securities; held for safekeeping; book entry account.

Any state agency which receives and holds securities for safekeeping purposes may hold and evidence such securities by book entry account rather than obtaining and retaining the original certificate.

Laws 1978, LB 763, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 24-604.01;

Laws 1990, LB 824, § 1.